Utah statutes.
3-1-26.   Separability clause.
If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or
circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity does not affect other
provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act
are declared to be severable.
